src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VV - gookookohoo :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     gookookohoo+NA: gookookohoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+gookookohoo+NA: nigookookohoo
     2+gookookohoo+NA: gigookookohoo
     3+gookookohoo+NA: ogookookohoo
     X+gookookohoo+NA: igookookohoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gookookohoo+NA+Con: gookookohoonh
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim: gookookohoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej: gookookohoosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Prt: gookookohooban
     gookookohoo+NA+Voc+Pl: gookookohoodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     gookookohoo+NA+4: gookookohoon
     gookookohoo+NA+Loc: gookookohoong
     gookookohoo+NA+Pl: gookookohoog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con: nigookookohoonh
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: nigookookohoons
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con: gigookookohoonh
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: gigookookohoons
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con: ogookookohoonh
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: ogookookohoons
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con: igookookohoonh
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim: igookookohoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: nigookookohoom
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: gigookookohoom
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: ogookookohoom
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos: igookookohoom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: nigookookohoosh
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: gigookookohoosh
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: ogookookohoosh
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej: igookookohoosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl: nigookookohoonaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl: gigookookohoonaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl: gigookookohoowaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4: ogookookohooni
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl: ogookookohoowaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Prt: nigookookohooban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoodig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Prt: gigookookohooban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoodig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Prt: ogookookohooban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoodig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Prt: igookookohooban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Voc+Pl: igookookohoodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+4: nigookookohoon
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: nigookookohoong
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: nigookookohoog
     2+gookookohoo+NA+4: gigookookohoon
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: gigookookohoong
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: gigookookohoog
     3+gookookohoo+NA+4: ogookookohoon
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: ogookookohoong
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: ogookookohoog
     X+gookookohoo+NA+4: igookookohoon
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Loc: igookookohoong
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pl: igookookohoog
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: gookookohoonyish
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: gookookohoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt: gookookohoonyiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gookookohoonyidig
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt: gookookohoonsiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gookookohoonsidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+4: gookookohoonyin
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: gookookohoonying
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: gookookohoonyig
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+4: gookookohoonsan
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: gookookohoonsing
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: gookookohoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt: gookookohooshiban
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookohooshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+4: gookookohooshan
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: gookookohooshing
     gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: gookookohooshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Prt+4: gookookohoobaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Prt+Loc: gookookohoobaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Prt+Pl: gookookohoobaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: nigookookohoonyim
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: nigookookohoonsim
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: gigookookohoonyim
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: gigookookohoonsim
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: ogookookohoonyim
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: ogookookohoonsim
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos: igookookohoonyim
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos: igookookohoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: nigookookohoonyish
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: nigookookohoonsish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: gigookookohoonyish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: gigookookohoonsish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: ogookookohoonyish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: ogookookohoonsish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej: igookookohoonyish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej: igookookohoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+1+Pl: nigookookohoonyinaan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nigookookohoonsinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+1+Pl: gigookookohoonyinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl: gigookookohoonyiwaa
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gigookookohoonsinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl: gigookookohoonsiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+4: ogookookohoonyini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3+Pl: ogookookohoonyiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+4: ogookookohoonsini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3+Pl: ogookookohoonsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt: nigookookohoonyiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonyidig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt: nigookookohoonsiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonsidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt: gigookookohoonyiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonyidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt: gigookookohoonsiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonsidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt: ogookookohoonyiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonyidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt: ogookookohoonsiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonsidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt: igookookohoonyiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: igookookohoonyidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt: igookookohoonsiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: igookookohoonsidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+4: nigookookohoonyin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: nigookookohoonying
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: nigookookohoonyig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+4: nigookookohoonsan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: nigookookohoonsing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: nigookookohoonsag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+4: gigookookohoonyin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: gigookookohoonying
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: gigookookohoonyig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+4: gigookookohoonsan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: gigookookohoonsing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: gigookookohoonsag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+4: ogookookohoonyin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: ogookookohoonying
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: ogookookohoonyig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+4: ogookookohoonsan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: ogookookohoonsing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: ogookookohoonsag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+4: igookookohoonyin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Loc: igookookohoonying
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pl: igookookohoonyig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+4: igookookohoonsan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Loc: igookookohoonsing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pl: igookookohoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: nigookookohoomish
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: gigookookohoomish
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: ogookookohoomish
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej: igookookohoomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl: nigookookohoominaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl: gigookookohoominaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4: ogookookohoomini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt: nigookookohoomiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoomidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt: gigookookohoomiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoomidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt: ogookookohoomiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoomidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt: igookookohoomiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: igookookohoomidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+4: nigookookohooman
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: nigookookohooming
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: nigookookohoomag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+4: gigookookohooman
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: gigookookohooming
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: gigookookohoomag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+4: ogookookohooman
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: ogookookohooming
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: ogookookohoomag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+4: igookookohooman
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Loc: igookookohooming
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pl: igookookohoomag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nigookookohooshinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gigookookohooshinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4: ogookookohooshini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt: nigookookohooshiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nigookookohooshidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt: gigookookohooshiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gigookookohooshidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt: ogookookohooshiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ogookookohooshidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt: igookookohooshiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: igookookohooshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+4: nigookookohooshan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: nigookookohooshing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: nigookookohooshag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+4: gigookookohooshan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: gigookookohooshing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: gigookookohooshag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+4: ogookookohooshan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: ogookookohooshing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: ogookookohooshag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+4: igookookohooshan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Loc: igookookohooshing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pl: igookookohooshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohoonaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoonaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoowaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoowaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Prt: ogookookohooniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohooniidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohoowaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoowaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+4: nigookookohoonaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+4: gigookookohoonaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+4: gigookookohoowaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoowaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoowaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+4: ogookookohooniwa
